Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2941.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 14-1 of the General Laws entitled "Proceedings in Family Court" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
14-1-72. Restraint of juveniles.
(a) No handcuffs, shackles, chains, irons, or other restraints shall be used on a juvenile
during transport to or from a court proceeding, during transport to any facility outside of the Rhode
Island training school for youth, or while appearing in a court proceeding, except in accordance
with the provisions of this section.
(b) A juvenile shall not be placed in physical restraints during transportation unless there
is a determination that such restraints are necessary due to one or more of the following
circumstances:
(1) There is reason to believe that the juvenile presents an immediate and credible risk of
escape that cannot be adequately mitigated through less restrictive means; or
(2) The juvenile poses a threat to the juvenile’s own safety or to the safety of others.
(3) If restraints are used on a juvenile pursuant to this section, the sheriff shall submit to
the director of the department of public safety within five (5) days a report articulating the grounds
that dictated the use of restraints.
(4) The department shall submit to the general assembly in January of each year a report
disclosing the number of juveniles who were subjected to restraints pursuant to this section, and

the grounds for their use. No individually identifying information of any juvenile shall be included
in the report.
(c) A juvenile shall not be placed in physical restraints during any court proceeding unless
the court presiding over the proceeding makes a specific finding, on the record, that such restraints
are necessary due to one or more of the following circumstances:
(1) The court has reason to believe that the juvenile presents an immediate and credible
risk of escape that cannot be adequately mitigated through less restrictive means; or
(2) The juvenile poses a threat to the juvenile’s own safety or to the safety of other persons
present in the courtroom.
(3) The use of restraints is reasonably necessary to maintain order and security in the
courtroom.
(4) The court shall submit to the general assembly in January of each year a report
disclosing the number of juveniles who were subjected to restraints pursuant to this section, and
the grounds for their use. No individually identifying information of any juvenile shall be included
in the report.
(d) If a determination is made that restraints are necessary, the least restrictive form of
restraint shall be used consistent with the legitimate security needs of each juvenile.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005319
========
LC005319 - Page 2 of 3